Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.358

New motor vehicle.

"New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that (1) is self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under this title, (2) has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee, and (3) is not a used vehicle as defined under RCW 46.04.660.

[ 2010 c 161 s 126.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.